Utah statutes.
72-11-201.   Passenger ropeways -- Purpose and scope.
(1)  In order to safeguard the life, health, property, and welfare of citizens
while using passenger ropeways, it is the policy of the state to:
(a)  protect citizens and visitors from unnecessary mechanical hazards in the
design, construction, and operation of passenger ropeways, but not from the
hazards inherent in the sports of mountaineering, skiing, snowboarding,
mountain biking, and hiking, or from the hazards of the area served by
passenger ropeways, all of which hazards are assumed by the  sportsman; and
(b)  require periodic inspections of passenger ropeways to ensure that each
passenger ropeway meets "The United States of America Standard Institute
Safety Code for Aerial Passenger Tramways," or an equivalent standard
established by rule under Section 72-11-210.
(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), the committee, through the
Department of Transportation, shall:
(i)  register all passenger ropeways in the state;
(ii)  establish reasonable standards of design, construction, and operational
practices; and
(iii)  make inspections as necessary to implement this section.
(b)  The committee has no jurisdiction over the construction, modification,
registration, or inspection of a private residence passenger ropeway.
